Maryland, session 2025, HB1501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–203.
(a) A person may not commit an assault.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person who violates
subsection (a) of this section is guilty of the misdemeanor of assault in the second degree
and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding
$2,500 or both.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “physical injury” means any impairment of physical
condition, excluding minor injuries.
(2) A person may not intentionally cause physical injury to another if the
person knows or has reason to know that the other is:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1501*

HOUSE BILL 1501
(i) a law enforcement officer engaged in the performance of the
officer’s official duties;
(ii) a parole or probation agent engaged in the performance of the
agent’s official duties; [or]
(iii) a firefighter, an emergency medical technician, a rescue squad
member, or any other first responder engaged in providing emergency medical care or
rescue services;
(IV) A SPECIAL ENFORCEMENT OFFICER AUTHORIZED BY
BALTIMORE CITY UNDER § 16–16A OF THE CODE OF PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS OF
BALTIMORE CITY ENGAGED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE OFFICER’S OFFICIAL
DUTIES;
(V) A SPECIAL PARKING ENFORCEMENT OFFICER AUTHORIZED
BY BALTIMORE CITY UNDER § 16–16B OF THE CODE OF PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS OF
BALTIMORE CITY ENGAGED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE OFFICER’S OFFICIAL
DUTIES; OR
(VI) A SPECIAL TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT OFFICER AUTHORIZED
BY BALTIMORE CITY UNDER § 16–16C OF THE CODE OF PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS OF
BALTIMORE CITY ENGAGED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE OFFICER’S OFFICIAL
DUTIES.
(3) A person who violates paragraph (2) of this subsection is guilty of the
felony of assault in the second degree and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not
exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.